output/dictionaries/Medzuslovjansky_KomboLatinicaKirilica.aff
FLAG long
SFX BJ Y 13
SFX BJ 0 0/xPxE .
SFX BJ е о/xPxBxO .
SFX BJ е и/xPxE .
SFX BJ 0 те/xPxE .
SFX BJ 0 та/xPxE .
SFX BJ е иј/xPxE .
SFX BJ 0 ти/xPxE .
SFX BJ 0 ту/xPxE .
SFX BJ е ах/xPxE .
SFX BJ е ам/xPxE .
SFX BJ 0 тем/xPxE .
SFX BJ 0 том/xPxE .
SFX BJ е ами/xPxE .

SFX BK Y 10
SFX BK 0 0/xPxE .
SFX BK 0 о/xPxBxO .
SFX BK 0 и/xPxE .
SFX BK 0 а/xPxE .
SFX BK 0 ев/xPxE .
SFX BK 0 у/xPxE .
SFX BK 0 ах/xPxE .
SFX BK 0 ам/xPxE .
SFX BK 0 ем/xPxE .
SFX BK 0 ами/xPxE .

SFX BL Y 11
SFX BL 0 0/xPxE .
SFX BL 0 о/xPxBxO .
SFX BL н 0 .
SFX BL 0 а/xPxE .
SFX BL ин ов/xPxE .
SFX BL 0 у/xPxE .
SFX BL ин ах/xPxE .
SFX BL ин ам/xPxE .
SFX BL 0 ом/xPxE .
SFX BL ин ами/xPxE .
SFX BL 0 е/xPxE .

SFX BM Y 4
SFX BM то его .
SFX BM то ем .
SFX BM то ему .
SFX BM то им .

SFX BN Y 80
SFX BN ти л .
SFX BN ти ла .
SFX BN ти ло .
SFX BN ти ли .
SFX BN ти м .
SFX BN ти ш .
SFX BN ти 0 .
SFX BN ти мо .
SFX BN и е .
SFX BN ти дут .
SFX BN ти х .
SFX BN ти ше .
SFX BN ти хмо .
SFX BN ти сте .
SFX BN ти ху .
SFX BN ти ј .
SFX BN ти јмо .
SFX BN ти јте .
SFX BN ти дучи .
SFX BN ти дучего .
SFX BN ти дучему .
SFX BN ти дучим .
SFX BN ти дучем .
SFX BN ти дучих .
SFX BN ти дучими .
SFX BN ти дуча .
SFX BN ти дучу .
SFX BN ти дучеј .
SFX BN ти дучеју .
SFX BN ти дуче .
SFX BN ти домы .
SFX BN ти домого .
SFX BN ти домому .
SFX BN ти домым .
SFX BN ти домом .
SFX BN ти домо .
SFX BN ти дома .
SFX BN ти дому .
SFX BN ти домој .
SFX BN ти домоју .
SFX BN ти доми .
SFX BN ти доме .
SFX BN ти домых .
SFX BN ти домым .
SFX BN ти домыми .
SFX BN ти домо .
SFX BN ти вши .
SFX BN ти вшего .
SFX BN ти вшему .
SFX BN ти вшим .
SFX BN ти вшем .
SFX BN ти вших .
SFX BN ти вшими .
SFX BN ти вша .
SFX BN ти вшу .
SFX BN ти вшеј .
SFX BN ти вшеју .
SFX BN ти вше .
SFX BN ти ны .
SFX BN ти ного .
SFX BN ти ному .
SFX BN ти ным .
SFX BN ти ном .
SFX BN ти ни .
SFX BN ти не .
SFX BN ти ных .
SFX BN ти ными .
SFX BN ти на .
SFX BN ти ну .
SFX BN ти ној .
SFX BN ти ноју .
SFX BN ти но .
SFX BN ти нје/xPxE .
SFX BN ти нја/xPxE .
SFX BN ти нју/xPxE .
SFX BN ти нјем/xPxE .
SFX BN ти ниј/xPxE .
SFX BN ти нјам/xPxE .
SFX BN ти нјами/xPxE .
SFX BN ти нјах/xPxE .

SFX BO Y 4
SFX BO тонебуд огонебуд .
SFX BO тонебуд омнебуд .
SFX BO тонебуд омунебуд .
SFX BO тонебуд ымнебуд .

SFX BP Y 80
SFX BP ти л .
SFX BP ти ла .
SFX BP ти ло .
SFX BP ти ли .
SFX BP зати жу .
SFX BP зати жем .
SFX BP зати жеш .
SFX BP зати же .
SFX BP зати жемо .
SFX BP зати жете .
SFX BP зати жут .
SFX BP ти х .
SFX BP ти ше .
SFX BP ти хмо .
SFX BP ти сте .
SFX BP ти ху .
SFX BP зати жи .
SFX BP зати жимо .
SFX BP зати жите .
SFX BP зати жучи .
SFX BP зати жучего .
SFX BP зати жучему .
SFX BP зати жучим .
SFX BP зати жучем .
SFX BP зати жучих .
SFX BP зати жучими .
SFX BP зати жуча .
SFX BP зати жучу .
SFX BP зати жучеј .
SFX BP зати жучеју .
SFX BP зати жуче .
SFX BP зати жемы .
SFX BP зати жемого .
SFX BP зати жемому .
SFX BP зати жемым .
SFX BP зати жемом .
SFX BP зати жемо .
SFX BP зати жема .
SFX BP зати жему .
SFX BP зати жемој .
SFX BP зати жемоју .
SFX BP зати жеми .
SFX BP зати жеме .
SFX BP зати жемых .
SFX BP зати жемым .
SFX BP зати жемыми .
SFX BP ти вши .
SFX BP ти вшего .
SFX BP ти вшему .
SFX BP ти вшим .
SFX BP ти вшем .
SFX BP ти вших .
SFX BP ти вшими .
SFX BP ти вша .
SFX BP ти вшу .
SFX BP ти вшеј .
SFX BP ти вшеју .
SFX BP ти вше .
SFX BP ти ны .
SFX BP ти ного .
SFX BP ти ному .
SFX BP ти ным .
SFX BP ти ном .
SFX BP ти ни .
SFX BP ти не .
SFX BP ти ных .
SFX BP ти ными .
SFX BP ти на .
SFX BP ти ну .
SFX BP ти ној .
SFX BP ти ноју .
SFX BP ти но .
SFX BP ти нје/xPxE .
SFX BP ти нја/xPxE .
SFX BP ти нју/xPxE .
SFX BP ти нјем/xPxE .
SFX BP ти ниј/xPxE .
SFX BP ти нјам/xPxE .
SFX BP ти нјами/xPxE .
SFX BP ти нјах/xPxE .

SFX BQ Y 4
SFX BQ обє ебе .
SFX BQ обє е .
SFX BQ обє и .
SFX BQ є оју .

SFX BR Y 4
SFX BR и ебе .
SFX BR и е .
SFX BR и обє .
SFX BR и обоју .

SFX BS Y 62
SFX BS ти л .
SFX BS ти ла .
SFX BS ти ло .
SFX BS ти ли .
SFX BS ти ју .
SFX BS ти јем .
SFX BS ти јеш .
SFX BS ти је .
SFX BS ти јемо .
SFX BS ти јете .
SFX BS ти јут .
SFX BS ти х .
SFX BS ти ше .
SFX BS ти хмо .
SFX BS ти сте .
SFX BS ти ху .
SFX BS ти ј .
SFX BS ти јмо .
SFX BS ти јте .
SFX BS ти јучи .
SFX BS ти јучего .
SFX BS ти јучему .
SFX BS ти јучим .
SFX BS ти јучем .
SFX BS ти јучих .
SFX BS ти јучими .
SFX BS ти јуча .
SFX BS ти јучу .
SFX BS ти јучеј .
SFX BS ти јучеју .
SFX BS ти јуче .
SFX BS ти јемы .
SFX BS ти јемого .
SFX BS ти јемому .
SFX BS ти јемым .
SFX BS ти јемом .
SFX BS ти јемо .
SFX BS ти јема .
SFX BS ти јему .
SFX BS ти јемој .
SFX BS ти јемоју .
SFX BS ти јеми .
SFX BS ти јеме .
SFX BS ти јемых .
SFX BS ти јемым .
SFX BS ти јемыми .
SFX BS ти вши .
SFX BS ти вшего .
SFX BS ти вшему .
SFX BS ти вшим .
SFX BS ти вшем .
SFX BS ти вших .
SFX BS ти вшими .
SFX BS ти вша .
SFX BS ти вшу .
SFX BS ти вшеј .
SFX BS ти вшеју .
SFX BS ти вше .
SFX BS и ы .
SFX BS и а .
SFX BS и о .
SFX BS и је .

SFX BT Y 11
SFX BT 0 0/xPxE .
SFX BT 0 о/xPxBxO .
SFX BT 0 ы/xPxE .
SFX BT 0 а/xPxE .
SFX BT 0 ов/xPxE .
SFX BT 0 у/xPxE .
SFX BT 0 ах/xPxE .
SFX BT 0 ам/xPxE .
SFX BT 0 ом/xPxE .
SFX BT 0 ами/xPxE .
SFX BT к че/xPxE .

SFX BU Y 18
SFX BU 0 0/xPxE .
SFX BU 0 е/xPxBxO .
SFX BU ј 0 .
SFX BU ј и/xPxE .
SFX BU 0 е/xPxE .
SFX BU ј е/xPxE .
SFX BU 0 а/xPxE .
SFX BU ј ев/xPxE .
SFX BU 0 ев/xPxE .
SFX BU 0 у/xPxE .
SFX BU ј ах/xPxE .
SFX BU 0 ах/xPxE .
SFX BU ј ам/xPxE .
SFX BU 0 ам/xPxE .
SFX BU ј ем/xPxE .
SFX BU 0 ем/xPxE .
SFX BU ј ами/xPxE .
SFX BU 0 ами/xPxE .

SFX BV Y 19
SFX BV 0 0/xPxE .
SFX BV 0 о/xPxBxO .
SFX BV от т/xPxE .
SFX BV от те/xPxE .
SFX BV 0 е/xPxE .
SFX BV от та/xPxE .
SFX BV 0 а/xPxE .
SFX BV от тев/xPxE .
SFX BV 0 ев/xPxE .
SFX BV от ту/xPxE .
SFX BV 0 у/xPxE .
SFX BV от тах/xPxE .
SFX BV 0 ах/xPxE .
SFX BV от там/xPxE .
SFX BV 0 ам/xPxE .
SFX BV от тем/xPxE .
SFX BV 0 ем/xPxE .
SFX BV от тами/xPxE .
SFX BV 0 ами/xPxE .

SFX BW Y 26
SFX BW 0 0/xPxE .
SFX BW и е/xPxE .
SFX BW и а/xPxE .
SFX BW и его/xBxPxE .
SFX BW и у/xPxE .
SFX BW и еј/xPxE .
SFX BW и ем/xPxE .
SFX BW и ему/xPxE .
SFX BW 0 м/xPxE .
SFX BW и еју/xPxE .
SFX BW 0 х/xPxE .
SFX BW 0 ми/xPxE .
SFX BW и ејши/zx .
SFX BW и ејшего/zx .
SFX BW и ејшему/zx .
SFX BW и ејшим/zx .
SFX BW и ејшем/zx .
SFX BW и ејше/zx .
SFX BW и ејша/zx .
SFX BW и ејшу/zx .
SFX BW и ејшеј/zx .
SFX BW и ејшеју/zx .
SFX BW и ејших/zx .
SFX BW и ејшим/zx .
SFX BW и ејшими/zx .
SFX BW и еје/zx .

SFX BX Y 68
SFX BX ти л .
SFX BX ти ла .
SFX BX ти ло .
SFX BX ти ли .
SFX BX єти ју .
SFX BX єти им .
SFX BX єти иш .
SFX BX єти и .
SFX BX єти имо .
SFX BX єти ите .
SFX BX єти ет .
SFX BX ти х .
SFX BX ти ше .
SFX BX ти хмо .
SFX BX ти сте .
SFX BX ти ху .
SFX BX єти ечи .
SFX BX єти еча .
SFX BX єти ече .
SFX BX єти имы .
SFX BX єти имого .
SFX BX єти имому .
SFX BX єти имым .
SFX BX єти имом .
SFX BX єти имо .
SFX BX єти има .
SFX BX єти иму .
SFX BX єти имој .
SFX BX єти имоју .
SFX BX єти ими .
SFX BX єти име .
SFX BX єти имых .
SFX BX єти имым .
SFX BX єти имыми .
SFX BX ти вши .
SFX BX ти вшего .
SFX BX ти вшему .
SFX BX ти вшим .
SFX BX ти вшем .
SFX BX ти вших .
SFX BX ти вшими .
SFX BX ти вша .
SFX BX ти вшу .
SFX BX ти вшеј .
SFX BX ти вшеју .
SFX BX ти вше .
SFX BX ти ны .
SFX BX ти ного .
SFX BX ти ному .
SFX BX ти ным .
SFX BX ти ном .
SFX BX ти ни .
SFX BX ти не .
SFX BX ти ных .
SFX BX ти ными .
SFX BX ти на .
SFX BX ти ну .
SFX BX ти ној .
SFX BX ти ноју .
SFX BX ти но .
SFX BX ти нје/xPxE .
SFX BX ти нја/xPxE .
SFX BX ти нју/xPxE .
SFX BX ти нјем/xPxE .
SFX BX ти ниј/xPxE .
SFX BX ти нјам/xPxE .
SFX BX ти нјами/xPxE .
SFX BX ти нјах/xPxE .

SFX BY Y 11
SFX BY 0 0/xPxE .
SFX BY 0 о/xPxBxO .
SFX BY 0 ы/xPxE .
SFX BY 0 а/xPxE .
SFX BY 0 ов/xPxE .
SFX BY 0 у/xPxE .
SFX BY 0 ах/xPxE .
SFX BY 0 ам/xPxE .
SFX BY 0 ом/xPxE .
SFX BY 0 ами/xPxE .
SFX BY х ше/xPxE .
