output/dictionaries/Medzuslovjansky_KomboLatinicaKirilica.dic
дєте/BJ
христијанин/BL
иночто/BM
додати/BN
ктонебуд/BO
лизати/BP
собє/BQ
си/BR
лити/BS
чрногорјанин/BL
пламенј/BU
лакот/BV
лос/BK
горєти/BX
мєх/BY
смєх/BY
синји/BW
језык/BT
помнєти/BX
чути/BS
дати/BN
трпєти/BX
бок/BT
страх/BY
најгорши/BW
гремєти/BX
звук/BT
крок/BT
комисар/BK
имєти/BS
муслиманин/BL
звєр/BK
обчи/BW
орєх/BY
облак/BT
прєдати/BN
дєти/BS
ногот/BV
рыс/BK
ризик/BT
развити/BS
лабед/BK
каменј/BU
сказати/BP
словјанин/BL
слєдујучи/BW
мак/BT
оказати/BP
творчји/BW
јечменј/BU
успєх/BY
усмєх/BY
всечто/BM
грєх/BY
подзрєти/BX
мыти/BS
гост/BK
грєти/BS
страјк/BT
воздух/BY
показати/BP
гребенј/BU
зет/BK
мазати/BP
дателјник/BT
казати/BP
пити/BS
горши/BW
припомнєти/BX
болєти/BX
убити/BS
вугор/BK
часовник/BT
јеленј/BU
рыбник/BT
прєтрпєти/BX
медвєд/BK
прєдшедши/BW
блок/BT
везати/BP
грах/BY
карас/BK
гус/BK
изпити/BS
крыти/BS
напомнєти/BX
настојечи/BW
лєкар/BK
прєдсказати/BP
граджанин/BL
коренј/BU
мнєти/BX
далјши/BW
кременј/BU
наказати/BP
врх/BY
селјанин/BL
рух/BY
најлучши/BW
рєзати/BP
чек/BT
кухар/BK
свезати/BP
прах/BY
горечи/BW
раздати/BN
обвезати/BP
облити/BS
утрпєти/BX
изтрпєти/BX
зрєти/BS
узрєти/BX
бити/BS
побити/BS
ранши/BW
поддати/BN
вєк/BT
крах/BY
гробар/BK
воздых/BY
продати/BN
библиотекар/BK
одрєзати/BP
дужи/BW
подлити/BS
гласник/BT
одказати/BP
чајник/BT
избух/BY
издати/BN
сумрак/BT
воздати/BN
подати/BN
свєжи/BW
прашек/BT
брити/BS
гнити/BS
оддати/BN
пробити/BS
задати/BN
попити/BS
упити/BS
изгнити/BS
вити/BS
цар/BK
изконавчи/BW
пострах/BY
најглубши/BW
поспєх/BY
возпомнєти/BX
именителјник/BT
слух/BY
секретар/BK
пролити/BS
записник/BT
чловєчји/BW
подсекретар/BK
урєзати/BP
индијанин/BL
неуспєх/BY
близши/BW
дєвичји/BW
дых/BY
доказати/BP
дождник/BT
гадји/BW
хладнєјши/BW
изрєзати/BP
клик/BT
кнез/BK
коминјар/BK
краснєјши/BW
цвєтучи/BW
младши/BW
најбогатши/BW
највечши/BW
најкрасивши/BW
најкрвавши/BW
најменши/BW
најпозднєјши/BW
најзимнєјши/BW
прєзрєти/BX
обрєзати/BP
петикутник/BT
повыши/BW
прєрєзати/BP
прєсвезати/BP
пух/BY
разбити/BS
разболєти/BS
развивајучи/BW
равнозначник/BT
рыбар/BK
рыцар/BK
спомнєти/BX
шестикутник/BT
трбух/BY
удивјајучи/BW
владар/BK
заболєти/BX
заболєвши/BW
заказати/BP
запах/BY
желєзничар/BK
барак/BT
лучши/BW
гуслар/BK
оддых/BY
војевничји/BW
четырокутник/BT
нотар/BK
жучји/BW
вторник/BT
гуслјар/BK
звателјник/BT
вытрпєти/BX
дворјанин/BL
нетопыр/BK
прєдложник/BT
надати/BN
дневник/BT
дух/BY
имучи/BW
кожух/BY
ланцух/BY
лгар/BK
најлегши/BW
облизати/BP
праздник/BT
простєјши/BW
ручник/BT
слити/BS
шершенј/BU
скрбєти/BX
скрипєти/BX
стих/BY
тычкоскок/BT
витез/BK
завезати/BP
безпокојечи/BW
что/BM
нєчто/BM
ничто/BM
почеткујучи/BW
позрєти/BX
прајезык/BT
приказати/BP
ширши/BW
срболужичанин/BL
указати/BP
высши/BW
англичанин/BL
италијанин/BL
мах/BY
мєшчанин/BL
набити/BS
навезати/BP
одбити/BS
размах/BY
всемогучи/BW
малјар/BK
месар/BK
пастыр/BK
пекар/BK
полдник/BT
поштар/BK
зеленинар/BK
оброк/BT
привезати/BP
разказати/BP
смєти/BS
тхор/BK
вырок/BT
прєдстојечи/BW
токар/BK
поток/BT
навык/BT
развезати/BP
благоволєти/BX
врєти/BX
знахар/BK
прєдзнак/BT
звєздар/BK
најдалјши/BW
млынар/BK
вабик/BT
вратар/BK
шити/BS
зашити/BS
пришити/BS
волєти/BX
впити/BS
марсианин/BL
тискар/BK
печетар/BK
полити/BS
шалик/BT
избити/BS
подгрєти/BS
захвачајучи/BW
тест/BK
алманах/BY
боднар/BK
боровик/BT
чрпак/BT
делфинји/BW
дудар/BK
главар/BK
горјанин/BL
господ/BK
господар/BK
говедји/BW
грнчар/BK
хамак/BT
излити/BS
изплєти/BS
јагнетји/BW
јаз/BK
смрєк/BT
конјар/BK
козји/BW
кожухар/BK
курји/BW
курник/BT
лопух/BY
мєсечник/BT
млєкар/BK
мравји/BW
нагрєти/BS
налити/BS
напити/BS
нарєзати/BP
нашити/BS
натрпєти/BX
наушник/BT
навити/BS
низати/BP
нјух/BY
обмазати/BP
обозрєти/BX
обрити/BS
обух/BY
обути/BS
обвити/BS
опити/BS
оплєти/BS
островјанин/BL
пчелник/BT
прстенј/BU
разгрєти/BS
разлити/BS
размазати/BP
разрєзати/BP
разути/BS
рыджи/BW
тлєти/BS
упыр/BK
вдєти/BS
велєти/BX
ветеринар/BK
врєск/BT
выти/BS
плєти/BS
овчар/BK
помазати/BP
намазати/BP
стеклник/BT
пыталник/BT
разпродати/BN
наркотик/BT
нишчечи/BW
нанизати/BP
свити/BS
рыти/BS
изшити/BS
киоск/BT
фартух/BY
удати/BN
сврбєти/BX
столјар/BK
инопланетјанин/BL
нејествујучи/BW
посувник/BT
хроникар/BK
придати/BN
интригујучи/BW
египчанин/BL
прахососалник/BT
смычек/BT
прибити/BS
одвезати/BP
депримујучи/BW
сметник/BT
сметјар/BK
шумєти/BX
јак/BT
одлити/BS
